Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8722
Patient Safety Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Patient Safety Cash Fund is created. The Patient Safety Cash Fund shall only be used to support the activities of a patient safety organization. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2019, LB25, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.